Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 7. Amendments and Changes.

Sec. 10.06.502.
Permitted and prohibited amendments.

By complying with the provisions of this chapter a corporation may amend its articles of incorporation from time to time and in as many respects as desired if its articles as amended contain only provisions that would be lawful to insert in original articles filed at the time of the filing of the amendment.

In particular, and without limitation upon the general power of amendment, a corporation may amend its articles of incorporation to

change its corporate name;

extend a limitation upon its period of duration;

change, enlarge, or diminish a limitation upon its corporate purpose;

increase or decrease the aggregate number of shares, or shares of a class, that the corporation has authority to issue;

exchange, classify, reclassify, or cancel all or part of its shares, whether issued or unissued;

change the designation of all or a part of its shares, whether issued or unissued, and to change the preferences, limitations, and the relative rights of all or part of its shares, whether issued or unissued;

change shares of a class, whether issued or unissued, into a different number of shares of the same class or into the same or a different number of shares of other classes;

create new classes or shares having rights and preferences either prior and superior or subordinate and inferior to the shares of a class then authorized, whether issued or unissued;

cancel or otherwise affect the right of the holders of the shares of a class to receive dividends that have accrued but have not been declared;

divide a preferred or special class of shares, whether issued or unissued, into series and fix and determine the designation of the series and the variations in the relative rights and preferences as between the shares of the series;

authorize the board to establish, out of authorized but unissued shares, series of a preferred or special class of shares and fix and determine the relative rights and preferences of the shares of the series;

authorize the board to fix and determine the relative rights and preferences of the authorized but unissued shares of series in which either the relative rights and preferences have not been fixed and determined or the relative rights and preferences are to be changed;

revoke, diminish, or enlarge the authority of the board to establish series out of authorized but unissued shares of a preferred or special class and fix and determine the relative rights and preferences of the shares of that series; and

limit, deny, or grant to shareholders of a class the preemptive right to acquire additional shares of the corporation, whether then or thereafter authorized.

A corporation may not amend its articles of incorporation to alter a statement that may appear in the original articles of the names and addresses of the first directors, or the name and address of the initial agent, except to correct an error in the statement or to delete either after the corporation has filed a notice under AS

10.06.165

or

10.06.813

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 8, ch. 166, SLA 1988, provides: “It is the intent of the legislature in enacting AS

10.06.502(a)

in sec. 1 of this Act to exercise to the fullest extent the reserve power of the state over corporations and to authorize any amendment of the articles permitted under AS

10.06.502(a)

regardless of whether a provision contained in the amendment was permissible at the time of the original incorporation of the corporation.”

Collateral references. —

18 C.J.S., Corporations, § 77 et seq.

Sec. 10.06.504.
Procedure to amend articles of incorporation; application to certain elections.

A corporation shall amend its articles of incorporation in the following manner:

if shares have not been issued, the board shall adopt a resolution setting out the proposed amendment or amendments;

subject to AS

10.06.506

, if shares have been issued, an amendment shall be approved by the board and the outstanding shares; approval may be initiated by the shareholders either before or after consideration by the board; if the board adopts a resolution setting out a proposed amendment, the board shall direct that the amendment be submitted to a vote at a meeting of shareholders that may be either the annual or a special meeting; if approval of the outstanding shares is obtained before action by the board, the board shall consider and either approve or reject the amendment at the next regular or special meeting;

unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, a corporation’s board of directors may adopt one or more of the following amendments to the articles of incorporation without shareholder action:

to delete the names and addresses of the initial directors;

to delete the name and address of the initial registered agent or registered office, if a statement of change is on file with the commissioner; or

to change each issued and unissued authorized share of an outstanding class into a greater number of whole shares if the corporation has only shares of that class outstanding.

A proposed amendment may be contained in restated articles of incorporation that contain

a statement that except for the designated amendment the restated articles correctly set out without change the provisions of the articles being amended; and

a statement that the restated articles together with the designated amendment supersede the original articles and all amendments to the original articles.

Written notice setting out the proposed amendment or amendments or a summary of the changes to be made shall be given to each shareholder of record entitled to vote thereon within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of shareholders. If the amendment is to be considered at an annual meeting, the proposed amendment or summary may be included in the notice of the annual meeting.

The requirement of an affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the shares entitled to vote for the adoption of an amendment to the articles of incorporation as provided in former AS 10.05.276 shall remain in force for corporations existing before July 1, 1989.

Notwithstanding (d) of this section, an election to be governed by the voting provisions of AS

10.06.504

—

10.06.506

, may be made in the same manner as an amendment to the articles of incorporation is made under those sections. An election under this subsection requires the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the shares entitled to vote under former AS 10.05.276(3).

History.

(§§ 1, 10(a), 10(b) ch 166 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (d) and (e) were enacted as § 10(a) and (b), ch. 166, SLA 1988 and codified as AS

10.06.960(l)

and (m) in 1996. Because these subsections should have been placed in this section rather than AS

10.06.960

, they were renumbered as (d) and (e) of this section in 1997, at which time “(d) of this section” was substituted for “(l) of this section” in subsection (e).

Cross references. —

For provision providing an exception to subsection (d) of this section relating to an amendment of the articles of incorporation of certain Native corporations to establish a lower quorum requirement for shareholder meetings, see AS

10.06.960(p)

.

Editor’s notes. —

Chapter 166, § 10, SLA 1988 provides: “AMENDMENT OF ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION. (a) The requirement of an affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the shares entitled to vote for the adoption of an amendment to the articles of incorporation as provided in former AS 10.05.276 shall remain in force for corporations existing before the effective date of this Act.

“(b) Notwithstanding (a) of this section, an election to be governed by the voting provisions of AS

10.06.504

—

10.06.506

, as enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, may be made in the same manner as an amendment to the articles of incorporation is made under those sections. An election under this subsection requires the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the shares entitled to vote under former AS 10.05.276(3).”

Sec. 10.06.506.
Class voting on amendments.

The holders of the outstanding shares of a class may vote as a class upon a proposed amendment, whether or not the holders are entitled to vote on the amendment by the provisions of the articles of incorporation, if the amendment

increases or decreases the aggregate number of authorized shares of the class;

exchanges, reclassifies, or cancels all or part of the shares of the class;

exchanges or creates a right of exchange of all or part of the shares of another class into the shares of the class;

changes the designations, preferences, limitations, or relative rights of the shares of the class;

changes the shares of the class into the same or a different number of shares of the same class or another class;

creates a new class of shares having rights and preferences prior and superior to the shares of the class, or increases the rights and preferences or the number of authorized shares of a class having rights and preferences prior or superior to the shares of the class;

divides the shares of a preferred or special class into series and fixes and determines the designation of the series and the variations in the relative rights and preferences between the shares of the series or authorizes the board to do so;

limits or denies the existing preemptive rights of the shares of the class;

cancels or otherwise affects dividends on the shares of the class that are accrued but not declared.

If the holders of the outstanding shares of a class are entitled to vote as a class under (a) of this section, the amendment is not approved unless it receives a majority vote of the outstanding shares of that class and approval of the outstanding shares.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Editor’s notes. —

Chapter 166, § 10, SLA 1988 provides: “AMENDMENT OF ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION. (a) The requirement of an affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the shares entitled to vote for the adoption of an amendment to the articles of incorporation as provided in former AS 10.05.276 shall remain in force for corporations existing before the effective date of this Act.

“(b) Notwithstanding (a) of this section, an election to be governed by the voting provisions of AS

10.06.504

—

10.06.506

, as enacted by sec. 1 of this Act, may be made in the same manner as an amendment to the articles of incorporation is made under those sections. An election under this subsection requires the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the shares entitled to vote under former AS 10.05.276(3).”

Sec. 10.06.508.
Greater voting requirements.

If the articles of incorporation require the vote of a larger proportion or of all of the shares of a class or series, or of a larger proportion or of all the directors, than is otherwise required by this chapter, the provision in the articles requiring the greater vote may not be altered, amended, or repealed except by that greater vote unless otherwise provided in the articles.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.510.
Execution and content of articles of amendment.

The articles of amendment shall be executed by the corporation by its president or vice-president and by its secretary or an assistant secretary and must set out the

name of the corporation;

amendment adopted;

date of the approval of the amendment by the board and outstanding shares, or by the board if shares have not been issued;

number of shares outstanding and the number of shares entitled to vote, and, if the shares of a class are entitled to vote as a class, the designation and number of outstanding shares of each class entitled to vote;

number of shares voted for and against the amendment and, if the shares of a class are entitled to vote as a class, the number of shares of each class voted for and against the amendment or, if shares have not been issued, a statement to that effect; and

manner in which an exchange, reclassification, or cancellation of issued shares is to be carried out if the amendment provides for an exchange, reclassification, or cancellation of issued shares and is not set out in the amendment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 8 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.06.512.
Filing of articles of amendment.

An original and an exact copy of the articles of amendment shall be delivered to the commissioner for processing according to AS

10.06.910

and for issuance of a certificate of amendment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.514.
Effective date and effect of amendment.

An amendment is effective upon the issuance of a certificate of amendment by the commissioner, or on a later date, not more than 30 days after the filing of the certificate with the commissioner, as provided in the articles of amendment.

An amendment may not affect an existing cause of action in favor of or against the corporation, or a pending suit to which the corporation is a party, or the existing rights of persons other than shareholders. If the corporate name is changed by amendment, a suit brought by or against the corporation under its former name does not abate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.516.
Restated articles of incorporation.

A domestic corporation may, by resolution adopted by the board, restate its articles of incorporation as amended up to that time. Upon the adoption of the resolution, restated articles shall be executed by the corporation by its president or a vice-president and by its secretary or an assistant secretary and must set out all of the operative provisions of the articles as amended up to that time together with a statement that the restated articles correctly set out without change the corresponding provisions of the articles as amended up to that time and that the restated articles supersede the original articles and all amendments to them.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 9 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.06.518.
Filing of restated articles of incorporation.

An original and an exact copy of the restated articles of incorporation shall be delivered to the commissioner for processing according to AS

10.06.910

and for issuance of a restated certificate of incorporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.520.
Effect of issuance of restated certificate of incorporation.

Upon the issuance of a restated certificate of incorporation, the restated articles of incorporation become effective and supersede the original articles and all amendments.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.522.
Amendment of articles of incorporation in reorganization proceedings.

If a plan of reorganization of a corporation has been confirmed by decree or order of a court in proceedings for the reorganization of the corporation under an applicable statute of the United States relating to reorganization of corporations, the articles of the corporation may be amended as necessary in the manner provided in (c) of this section, in order to carry out the plan and put it into effect, only if the articles as amended contain provisions that might be lawfully contained in original articles at the time of the making of the amendment.

In particular, and without limitation upon the general power of amendment, the articles of incorporation may be amended to

change the corporate name, period of duration, or corporate purposes of the corporation;

repeal, alter, or amend the bylaws of the corporation;

change the aggregate number of shares or shares of a class that the corporation has authority to issue;

change the preferences, limitation, and relative rights of all or part of the shares of the corporation, and classify, reclassify, or cancel all or part of the shares, whether issued or unissued;

authorize the issuance of bonds, debentures, or other obligations of the corporation, whether or not convertible into shares of a class or bearing warrants or other evidences of optional rights to purchase or subscribe for shares of a class, and fix the terms and conditions of the bonds, debentures, or other obligations; and

constitute or reconstitute and classify or reclassify the board of the corporation, and appoint directors and officers in place of or in addition to all or any of the directors or officers then in office.

Articles of amendment approved by decree or order of a court shall be executed by the person or persons the court designates or appoints for the purpose and must set out the name of the corporation, the amendments of the articles approved by the court, the date of the decree or order approving the articles of amendment, the title of the proceedings in which the decree or order was entered, and a statement that the decree or order was entered by a court having jurisdiction of the proceedings for the reorganization of the corporation under an applicable statute of the United States.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 10 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.06.524.
Filing of amendment of articles in reorganization proceedings.

An original and an exact copy of the articles of amendment in reorganization proceedings shall be delivered to the commissioner for processing according to AS

10.06.910

and for issuance of a certificate of amendment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.526.
Effective date and effect of amendment of articles in reorganization proceedings.

An amendment becomes effective upon the issuance of a certificate of amendment in reorganization proceedings, and the articles are considered to be amended without action by the directors or shareholders of the corporation and with the same effect as if the amendments had been adopted by unanimous action of the directors and shareholders of the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)